Louisiana, session 2026, SB279.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 6:255(A) and (G) and 1204 are hereby amended and reenacted and
R.S. 6:707(E) is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§255. Certificates of stock and uncertificated shares
A. Shares must shall be represented by certificates of stock unless the issuing
corporation is a participant in the Direct Registration System, or its successor, of the
Depository Trust & Clearing Corporation, or as provided in Subsection G of this
Section, then shares need not be represented by certificates of stock. Unless
expressly provided elsewhere, the rights and obligations of shareholders are not
affected regardless of whether the shares are represented by certificates of stock.
* * *
G.(1) Unless the articles of incorporation or bylaws provide otherwise, the
board of directors of a corporation may authorize the issue of some or all of the
shares of any or all of its classes or series of shares without certificates as
uncertificated shares, including but not limited to the use of a book entry or any
Page 1 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 279 ENROLLED
other electronic method for documenting shareholder ownership. The
authorization does not affect shares already represented by certificates until they are
surrendered to the corporation.
(2) The board of directors of a corporation may by a majority vote
authorize by resolution the conversion of some or all of the shares of any or all
classes or series of its stock from stock certificates to uncertificated shares.
(3) Notwithstanding any other law to the contrary, the provisions of this
Subsection apply to any state-chartered bank and any bank holding company.
* * *
§707. Capital stock; types of stock; consideration for issuance; security for loan
* * *
E. The provisions of R.S. 6:255 apply to any capital stock association and
its holding company.
* * *
§1204. Capital stock; authorization of issuance
A. A savings bank may provide for the issuance of capital stock, either by its
original articles of incorporation or by an amendment thereto authorized by this
Chapter.
B. Notwithstanding any provision of law to the contrary, the provisions
of R. S. 6:255 apply to any Louisiana state-chartered savings bank and its
holding company.
Section 2. R.S. 12:1-625(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§1-625. Form and content of certificates
A. Shares shall be represented by share certificates unless the issuing
corporation is a participant in the Direct Registration System of the Depository Trust
& Clearing Corporation or of a similar book-entry system used in the trading of
shares of public corporations or as otherwise provided in R.S. 6:255 relative to
financial institutions and their holding companies. If the issuing corporation is a
participant in the Direct Registration System or a similar book-entry system, shares
may but need not be represented by certificates. Unless this Chapter or another
Page 2 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 279 ENROLLED
statute expressly provides otherwise, the rights and obligations of shareholders are
identical whether or not their shares are represented by certificates.
* * *
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 3 of 3
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.